apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix
<pardef n="kamen__n"   >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>  
    <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sumra/k__n"   >
    <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ka</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>če</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kom</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ci</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ka</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ke</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ci</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="monar/h__n"   >
    <e><p><l>h</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ha</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>hu</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>h</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>še</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>hu</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>hom</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>si</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ha</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>sima</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>he</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>si</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>sima</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>sima</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
</pardefs>

<e lm="kamen"><i>kamen</i><par n="kamen__n" /></e>
<e lm="greben"><i>greben</i><par n="kamen__n" /></e>
<e lm="jablan"><i>jablan</i><par n="kamen__n" /></e>
<e lm="monarh"><i>monar</i><par n="monar/h__n" /></e>
<e lm="pastuh"><i>pastu</i><par n="monar/h__n" /></e>
<e lm="sumrak"><i>sumra</i><par n="sumra/k__n" /></e>
<e lm="veznik"><i>vezni</i><par n="sumra/k__n" /></e>
